Utah statutes.
58-20a-304.   Continuing education.

Each person holding a license under this chapter as an environmental health scientist or an environmental health scientist-in-training shall complete in each two-year period of licensure not fewer than 30 hours of professional continuing education in accordance with standards defined by division rule.



Enacted by Chapter 95, 1995 General Session

